North Carolina, session 2025, HB548.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Commerce the recurring sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for each fiscal year of
the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to conduct biannual analyses of Economic Progress in North
Carolina. The Department shall report the results of the analyses to the General Assembly no
later than January 31 of every odd-numbered year, and each report shall meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) Utilize publicly available data and interview people of various socioeconomic
backgrounds.
(2) Measure, for the State and each county, at least the following metrics:
*H548-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. Hardship, as measured by the poverty rate, child poverty, deep
poverty, inequality, and the supplemental poverty rate.
b. Share of jobs that (i) pay below a living income wage and (ii) provide
basic needs and quality conditions and benefits.
c. Share of a household's monthly income that goes to food, housing,
health care, and childcare.
d. Percent of people who are considered cost-burdened based on the
amount of income spent on housing, childcare, and health care
premiums.
e. Cost of postsecondary education and job training relative to income.
f. Persistent poverty census tracts and concentrated poverty census
tracts, including the number of people living in persistent and
concentrated poverty neighborhoods.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 548-First Edition